apertium-nya.nya.twoc
Alphabet
 %[%+sg%]:0 %[%+pl%]:0 %[%+p1%]:0 %[%+cl1%]:0 %[%+cl1a%]:0 %[%+cl3%]:0 %[%+cl5%]:0 %[%+cl7%]:0 %[%+cl9%]:0 %[%+cl9a%]:0 %[%+cl12%]:0 %[%+cl14%]:0 %[%+cl15%]:0 %[%+cl16%]:0 %[%+cl17%]:0 %[%+cl18%]:0 %[%+inf%]:0 %[%+pres%]:0 

 %[%-sg%]:0 %[%-pl%]:0 %[%-p1%]:0 %[%-cl1%]:0 %[%-cl1a%]:0 %[%-cl3%]:0 %[%-cl5%]:0 %[%-cl7%]:0 %[%-cl9%]:0 %[%-cl9a%]:0 %[%-cl12%]:0 %[%-cl14%]:0 %[%-cl15%]:0 %[%-cl16%]:0 %[%-cl17%]:0 %[%-cl18%]:0 %[%-inf%]:0 %[%-pres%]:0 
;

Rules

"Match prefix"
Sx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Sy:0 ;
   where Sx in ( %[%-sg%] %[%-pl%] %[%-p1%] %[%-cl1%] %[%-cl1a%] %[%-cl3%] %[%-cl5%] %[%-cl7%] %[%-cl9%] %[%-cl9a%] %[%-cl12%] %[%-cl14%] %[%-cl15%] %[%-cl16%] %[%-cl17%] %[%-cl18%] %[%-inf%] %[%-pres%] )
         Sy in ( %[%+sg%] %[%+pl%] %[%+p1%] %[%+cl1%] %[%+cl1a%] %[%+cl3%] %[%+cl5%] %[%+cl7%] %[%+cl9%] %[%+cl9a%] %[%+cl12%] %[%+cl14%] %[%+cl15%] %[%+cl16%] %[%+cl17%] %[%+cl18%] %[%+inf%] %[%+pres%] )
   matched ;

"Inverse of Match prefix for use with mismatched tags"
Sx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Sy:0 :* _ ;
   where Sy in ( %[%-sg%] %[%-pl%] %[%-p1%] %[%-cl1%] %[%-cl1a%] %[%-cl3%] %[%-cl5%] %[%-cl7%] %[%-cl9%] %[%-cl9a%] %[%-cl12%] %[%-cl14%] %[%-cl15%] %[%-cl16%] %[%-cl17%] %[%-cl18%] %[%-inf%] %[%-pres%] )
         Sx in ( %[%+sg%] %[%+pl%] %[%+p1%] %[%+cl1%] %[%+cl1a%] %[%+cl3%] %[%+cl5%] %[%+cl7%] %[%+cl9%] %[%+cl9a%] %[%+cl12%] %[%+cl14%] %[%+cl15%] %[%+cl16%] %[%+cl17%] %[%+cl18%] %[%+inf%] %[%+pres%] )
matched ;



!Sets
!
!Features = %[%+sg%] %[%+pl%] %[%+abs%] %[%+def%] %[%+inst%] %[%+p1%] %[%+p2%] %[%+p3%] %[%+aa%] %[%+nn%];
!
!Rules
!
!"Match prefixes with agreement tags"
!Fx:0 <=> _ :* Fx:0 ;
!         Fx:0 :* _ ;
!     where Fx in Features ;
